test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-55kwnwlwma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - kõnõlõma: # Verb (55) kõnõlõma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kõnõlõma+V+Inf/mA: kõnõlõma
     kõnõlõma+V+Inf: kõnõldaq
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+PrfPrc: kõnõlnuq
     kõnõlõma+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [kõnõld, kõnõldu]

     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [kõnõlõ, kõnõla]
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kõnõlõt, kõnõlõdõq, kõnõlat, kõnõladõq]
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [kõnõlõs, kõnõlas]
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [kõnõlõmiq, kõnõlamiq]
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [kõnõlõtiq, kõnõlatiq]
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [kõnõlõsõq, kõnõlasõq]
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: [kõnõlõ, kõnõla]
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kõnõli
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kõnõlit, kõnõliq, kõnõlidõq]
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kõnõlʼ, kõnõli]
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kõnõlimiq
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kõnõlitiq
     kõnõlõma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kõnõliq, kõnõlivaq]

     kõnõlõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kõnõlda
     kõnõlõma+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kõnõldas

     kõnõlõma+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kõnõlõv

     kõnõlõma+V+Jus: kõnõlguq
